Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-213
Deeds and other instruments; executed without seal; validated.

All deeds, mortgages, or other instruments in writing, for the conveyance or encumbrance of real estate, or any interest therein, which have been made and executed without the use of a private seal are declared to be legal and valid in all courts of law and equity in this state and elsewhere.

R.S.1866, c. 49, § 2, p. 376;

R.S.1913, § 6252;

C.S.1922, § 5651;

C.S.1929, § 76-257;

R.S.1943, § 76-213.